Washington statutes.
RCW 43.102.100

Analysis of data—Reports.

The office will conduct analysis of use of force and other data to the extent such data is available to the office. The director is authorized to enter into contracts or memoranda of understanding to access data as needed. If data is available, the office should, at a minimum, analyze and report annually: Analysis and research regarding any identified trends, patterns, or other situations identified by the data; and recommendations for improvements. After July 1, 2025, the office should also annually report recommendations, if any, for expanding the scope of investigations or jurisdiction of the office based on trends, data, or reports received by the agency.

[ 2024 c 64 s 4; 2021 c 318 s 310.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2021 c 318: See note following RCW 43.102.020.